Massachusetts, session 194th, S1797.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 94B the
following new section:-
Section 94C. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the
contrary, and for the purposes of any death, disability or medical services claim including claims
under Chapter 32, Chapter 41 and Chapter 152 of the General Laws, any contagious disease,
resulting in disability or death to a full-time uniformed member of a paid police department, fire
department or municipal emergency medical service shall, if he or she successfully passed a
physical examination on entry into such service or subsequent to such entry, which examination
failed to reveal any evidence of such condition, be presumed to have been suffered in the line of
duty, unless it is shown by a preponderance of the evidence that non-service connected risk
of 2

factors or non-service connected accidents or hazards undergone, or any combination thereof,
caused such incapacity. The provisions of this section shall only apply if the disabling or fatal
condition is a type of contagious disease which may, in general, result from exposure to blood
and other body fluids of the sick, excluding the common cold. (2) Any person first discovering
any such condition within five years of the last date on which such person actively so served
shall be eligible to apply for benefits hereunder, and such benefits, if granted, shall be payable as
of the date on which the employee last received regular compensation. The provisions of this
section shall not apply to any person serving in such position unless such person shall first
establish that he has regularly responded to calls for police, fire or emergency medical service
during some portion of the period of his service in such position. (3) The provisions of this
section shall also apply to any condition of COVID-19, Hepatitis A, B, or C, Tuberculosis, HIV,
and any other contagious disease which is found by regulation by the commissioner of the
department of public health to have a statistically significant correlation with police, fire or
emergency medical service. (4) Nothing herein shall preclude a member from applying for and
receiving benefits under section seven or section nine, subject to the provisions of said sections.
of 2